District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.11

Required Environmental Impact Statements.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, a full EIS shall be required for the construction of any new solid waste facility or the substantial modification of an existing structure presently used as, or intended to be used as, a solid waste facility, as the term “solid waste facility” is defined in Chapter 10 of Title 8, regardless of the cost of construction or modification.

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 11a
as added Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 802, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 6-990.1.